Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 1. Child Health Insurance Program

§ 35-25-101.
Uninsured child health insurance program.

There is created a child health insurance program for families with a gross monthly income at or below one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) of the federal poverty level, until July 1, 2005, and thereafter, for families with a gross monthly income at or below two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 99, § 1.

§ 35-25-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Child” means a person who has not yet reached the nineteenth anniversary of his birth;

“Department” means the department of health;

“Federal poverty level” means the federal poverty guideline updated annually in the federal register by the United States department of health and human services under the authority of section 673(2) of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981;

“Private health insurance” means an individual insurance policy or contract for the purpose of paying for or reimbursing the cost of dental, hospital and medical care;

“State plan” means the state plan required by 42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq. to be submitted by the state to the United States secretary of health and human services to receive federal funding for a child health insurance program;

“This act” means W.S.

35-25-101

through

35-25-108

.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 99, § 1; 2016 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, added “dental” preceding “hospital and medical care” in (a)(iv).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(v), near the middle substituted “42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.” for “Public Law 105-33.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Federal law. —

Public Law 105-33 is the Balanced Budget Act of 1997. [Title XI of Act Aug. 5, 1997]

Section 673(2) of the Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981 is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 9902 (2).

§ 35-25-103.
Child health insurance program eligibility; services by department or private health insurance.

Subject to approval of the state plan by the United States secretary of health and human services, and subject to available state and federal funding the department shall provide a health insurance plan for an eligible child whose monthly gross family income is not more than two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level. A child who is determined eligible to receive benefits under this section shall remain eligible for twelve (12) months as long as the child resides in the state of Wyoming and has not yet attained nineteen (19) years of age. A child’s eligibility to receive benefits under this act shall be redetermined on an annual basis. A simplified application process, which includes minimum eligibility requirements, shall be provided throughout the state at various public and private establishments approved by the department of health. To be determined eligible to receive benefits under this section, a child shall not be eligible under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act, shall not have been covered under another health insurance plan for a minimum of one (1) month prior to application for coverage under this act or, upon birth, the child would not otherwise be covered by a public or private health insurance plan. Eligibility under this section shall be determined by the department of health or its designee.

The child health insurance plan required by subsection (a) of this section shall be provided either through a private health insurance company licensed by the insurance commissioner to write insurance in Wyoming or by the department of health’s division responsible for administering the Medicaid program. The department’s division shall be used to provide the insurance plan only if it can provide the plan at a lower cost than can a qualified private insurance company or if use of the division will otherwise accrue more benefits to the state than will use of a private insurance company. If the child health insurance plan required by subsection (a) of this section is provided through the department’s division, the department shall competitively procure the contract at least once every five (5) years. In awarding the contract the department shall compare the cost of operating the program through a private insurance company to a forecasted state administered alternative.

A medical provider who accepts payment for services provided under this section shall not charge or attempt to collect payments in excess of a rate schedule established by the department or in excess of rates negotiated with a private health insurance company who is offering child health insurance pursuant to this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 99, § 1; 2020 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (b) and (c).

Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act. —

See §

42-4-101

et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act”, as used in this section, see § 35-25-102(a)(vi).

§ 35-25-104.
Program benefits.

A child eligible for services under this act shall receive benefits developed by the department as allowed by 42 U.S.C. 1397cc et seq. and that include:

Cost sharing factors, not to exceed the maximum allowable under 42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.;

Exclusions and limitations;

Inpatient and outpatient hospital services;

Physician services;

Laboratory and x-ray services;

Well-baby and well-child care including age appropriate immunizations;

Prescription drug coverage;

Vision coverage;

Dental coverage including preventive and basic services; and

Provision of all services through managed care pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 1397cc(f)(3). This paragraph shall be effective only if the child insurance program under this act is provided through a private insurance company licensed by the insurance commissioner to write insurance in Wyoming.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 99, § 1; 2017 ch. 60, § 1, effective March 31, 2018; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2017 amendments.—

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 60, § 1, effective Mar. 31, 2018, added the (a) and (a)(i) through (a)(ix) designations, and made related changes; in (a)(ii) deleted “The benefit package shall include, at minimum” at the end of the clause; in (a)(vi), deleted “and the additional services of” following “ appropriate immunizations”; added (a)(x), and made related changes.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i), substituted “ 42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.” for “Public Law 105-33.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been set out as reconciled by the legislative service office.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “department as allowed by 42 U.S.C. 1397cc et seq. and” for “health benefits committee established under W.S.

35-25-105

.”

Federal law. —

Public Law 105-33 is the Balanced Budget Act of 1997. [Title XI of Act Aug. 5, 1997]

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-25-102(a)(vi).

§ 35-25-105.
Health benefits plan committee. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 99, § 1; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; repealed by 2020 ch. 10, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 35-25-106.
Private health insurance plan request for proposals.

If the child health insurance plan required by W.S.

35-25-103

is provided through a private health insurance company, the department shall issue a request for proposals from qualified insurers not less than once every five (5) years, in addition to the requirements set forth in W.S.

35-25-103

(b). The department shall award the contract for this service to an insurer based on price, the provision of required services and other factors listed in the department’s request for proposals. A contract for health insurance awarded under this section shall contain provisions with respect to exclusions from coverage for preexisting conditions that are no more restrictive than those described in 42 U.S.C. 1397bb(b)(1)(B)(ii). The contract shall include provisions for changes in terms and conditions and for rebidding in case major changes are needed. The department shall have the right to rebid the contract after two (2) years.

Biennially, the department may allow a contractor providing child health insurance pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to adjust the price charged for the coverage, but if the price is increased, the department may, after public notice, rebid the contract or the department may administer the program pursuant to W.S.

35-25-103

.

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 10, § 2.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 99, § 1; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 10, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a) substituted “ 42 U.S.C. 1397bb(b)(1)(B)(ii)” for “section 2102 (b)(1)(B)(ii) of Public Law 105-33.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the first sentence of (a) added “If the child health insurance plan required by W.S.

35-25-103

is provided through a private health insurance company,” substituted “issue” for “publish notice of” following “the department shall,” substituted “not less than once every five (5) years, in addition to the requirements set forth in W.S.

35-25-103

(b)” for “to provide a health insurance plan for children insured under W.S. 35-25-103 of this act,” in the second sentence substituted “required” for “benchmark” preceding “services and other factors,” deleted “determined pursuant to W.S. 35-25-105(c),” following “provision of required services,” added “for proposals” at the end, and in the third sentence, substituted “A” for “The”; rewrote (b) which formerly read: “Biennially, the department may allow the contractor to adjust the price charged for the coverage, but if the price is increased, the department may, after public notice, rebid the contract”; and repealed (c) which read: “If the department does not receive a proposal from an insurance company within one hundred twenty (120) days after issuing the request for proposals required in subsection (a) of this section, the department may provide services to children eligible under this act with a public health benefit package designed to provide the same services as authorized under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act. A medical provider who accepts payment for services provided under this subsection shall not charge or attempt to collect payments in excess of the rate schedule established by the department of health.”

Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act. —

See §

42-4-101

.

Federal law. —

Public Law 105-33 is the Balanced Budget Act of 1997. [Title XI of Act Aug. 5, 1997]

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” as used in this section, see § 35-25-102(a)(vi).

§ 35-25-107.
Program expenditures; monitoring; recommendations; required action to limit expenditures to budget available.

The department shall project monthly expenditures under this act each month through the end of the biennium based upon the level of activity for the previous months and the trend in expenditures compared to previous expenditures. If the projections indicate that expenditures may exceed the federal and state funds available under this act, the department, may, by rule and regulation and subject to availability of funds, limit participation in the program under this section as follows:

The department may impose a partial or total moratorium on new enrollments in the programs under this act until funds are available to meet the needs of new enrollees;

For current recipients of benefits under this act, priority for the continuation of funding shall be given to those families with the lowest incomes.

In the last six (6) months of the biennium, the department shall include a projection of expenditures for the next biennium based on the spending for the current biennium unless the legislature provides for a different level of funding for the next biennium.

The funding for the child health insurance program shall be deemed to be included within the division of health care financing line item within the department of health budget unless a separate line item is provided in the budget bill. General fund expenditures for the child health program shall not exceed the amount needed to match federal funds without explicit authorization enacted in the budget bill.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 99, § 1; 2016 ch. 20, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division of health care financing line” for “community and family health division line” in (c).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act”, as used in this section, see § 35-25-102(a)(vi).

§ 35-25-108.
Implementation; duties; restrictions on the department of health.

The department shall:

Administer this act within the fiscal constraints of 42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq. and subsequent federal enactments governing this program and the state budget as enacted by the legislature;

Develop a state plan for child health insurance to qualified recipients under this act and otherwise provide for the effective administration of this act;

Maintain records on the administration of this act and report to the federal government as required by federal law and regulation;

Adopt, amend and rescind rules and regulations on the administration of this act following notice and public hearing in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act;

Establish indicators for measuring access, process, quality and outcomes effectiveness in improving children’s health.

The department shall not implement:

The program under this act until a state plan has been approved by the United States secretary of health and human services or, for any modified plan, until the modified plan has been approved if the modifications require the approval of the United States secretary of health and human services; and

Any state plan that does not conform to the requirements of this act.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 99, § 1; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 10, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(i) substituted “42 U.S.C. 1397aa et seq.” for “Public Law 105-33.”

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b)(i), added “or, for any modified plan, until the modified plan has been approved if the modifications require the approval of the United States secretary of health and human services” at the end.

Federal law. —

Public Law 105-33 is the Balanced Budget Act of 1997. [Title XI of Act Aug. 5, 1997]

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act”, as used in this section, see § 35-25-102(a)(vi).

§§ 35-25-109 and 35-25-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 99, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1999, ch. 137, § 1, related to immunization and well care, duties of the department of health, and restriction on the department of health.

§ 35-25-111.
Participation of parents or guardians; employer premium contribution. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 2006, ch. 66, § 1; repealed by 2016 ch. 20, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.